Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB751.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 369.135 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter
365, and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Credit card" means an instrument or device, which may be in tangible or
electronic form, that is issued by a business organization or financial
institution for use by a cardholder to obtain goods, services, or anything else
of value on credit;
(b) "Debit card":
1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, means an
instrument or device, which may be in tangible or electronic form, that
is issued by a business organization or financial institution for use by
a cardholder to obtain goods, services, or anything else of value,
where payment for the goods, the services, or anything else of value is
made using funds previously deposited by the cardholder; and
2. Does not include a check, draft, or other negotiable instrument,
whether in paper or electronic form;
(c) "Digital asset" has the same meaning as in KRS 369.130; and
(d) "Wallet" has the same meaning as in KRS 369.130.
(2) An individual shall not be prohibited from:
(a) Accepting a digital asset, credit card, or debit card as a method of[digital
assets for] payment for legal goods or services; or
(b) The use of a wallet.
(3)[(2)] A digital asset, credit card, or debit card[Digital assets] used as a method of
payment shall not be subject to additional taxes, withholdings, assessments, or
charges that are based solely on the use of the digital asset, credit card, or debit
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/23/2026 1:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 76
card as the method of payment.
(4)[(3)] This section shall not:
(a) Prohibit the imposition or collection of taxes, withholdings, assessments, or
charges on a digital asset, credit card, or debit card[digital assets] used as the
method of payment when the same imposition and collections of taxes,
withholdings, assessments, or charges are made on similar transactions which
use the legal tender of the United States as the method of payment; or
(b) Require any person to accept a digital asset, credit card, or debit card as a
method of[digital assets for] payment for legal goods or services.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/23/2026 1:27 PM Jacketed